Vermont, session 2025-2026, S125.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
16 * * * Workers’ Compensation * * *
17 Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A § 601 is amended to read:
18 § 601. DEFINITIONS
19 As used in this chapter:

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 2 of 17
1 * * *
2 (31) “Medical case management” means the planning and coordination
3 of health care services appropriate to achieve the goal of medical
4 rehabilitation.
5 (A) Medical case management may include medical case assessment,
6 including a personal interview with the injured employee; assistance in
7 developing, implementing, and coordinating a medical care plan with health
8 care providers in consultation with the injured employee and the employees’
9 family; and an evaluation of treatment results. The goal of medical case
10 management is to provide the injured employee with reasonable treatment
11 options to ensure that the injured employee can make an informed choice.
12 (B) Medical case managers shall not provide medical care or adjust
13 claims.
14 (C) An injured employee shall be entitled to medical case
15 management services if reasonably supported. Reasonable support includes a
16 recommendation made by a health care provider or evidence demonstrating the
17 injured employee’s medical recovery would benefit from the services, or both.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 3 of 17
1 Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 602 is amended to read:
2 § 602. PROCESS AND PROCEDURE
3 * * *
4 (d) When an injured employee does not speak English fluently, the
5 employer shall pay for translation services to ensure the injured employee fully
6 understands the employee’s rights and can effectively participate in the
7 employee’s medical recovery and the workers’ compensation claims process.
8 Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. 640b is amended to read:
9 § 640b. REQUEST FOR PREAUTHORIZATION TO DETERMINE IF
10 PROPOSED BENEFITS OR SERVICES ARE NECESSARY
11 (a) As used in this section,:
12 (1) “benefits” “Benefits” means medical treatment and surgical,
13 medical, and nursing services and supplies, including prescription drugs and
14 durable medical equipment.
15 (2) “Services” means medical case management services.
16 * * *
17 (e) Within 14 days after receiving a request for preauthorization of
18 proposed medical case management services, the insurer shall do one of the
19 following, in writing:

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 4 of 17
1 (1) Authorize the services and notify the injured employee, the
2 Department, and the treating provider recommending the services, if
3 applicable.
4 (2) Deny the services because the entire claim is disputed, and the
5 Commissioner has not issued an interim order to pay benefits. The insurer
6 shall notify the injured employee, the Department, and the treating provider
7 recommending the services, if applicable, of the decision to deny benefits.
8 (3) Deny the request if there is not reasonable support for the requested
9 services. The insurer shall notify the injured employee, the Department, and
10 the treating provider recommending the services, if applicable, of the decision
11 to deny benefits.
12 (4) Notify the injured employee, the Department, and the treating
13 provider recommending the services, if applicable, that the insurer has
14 scheduled an examination of the injured employee pursuant to section 655 of
15 this title or ordered a medical record review pursuant to section 655a of this
16 title. Based on the examination or review, the insurer shall notify the injured
17 employee and the Department of the decision within 45 days after a request for
18 preauthorization. The Commissioner may, in the Commissioner’s sole
19 discretion, grant a 10-day extension to the insurer to authorize or deny the
20 services, and such an extension shall not be subject to appeal.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 5 of 17
1 (f) If the insurer fails to authorize or deny the services pursuant to
2 subsection (e) of this section within 14 days after receiving a request, the
3 injured employee or the injured employee’s treating provider, if applicable,
4 may request that the Department issue an order authorizing services. After
5 receipt of the request, the Department shall issue an interim order within five
6 days after notice to the insurer, and five days in which to respond, absent
7 evidence that the entire claim is disputed. Upon request of a party, the
8 Commissioner shall notify the parties that the services have been authorized by
9 operation of law.
10 (g) If the insurer denies the preauthorization of the services pursuant to
11 subdivision (e)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, the Commissioner may, on the
12 Commissioner’s own initiative or upon a request by the injured worker, issue
13 an order authorizing the services if the Commissioner finds that the evidence
14 shows that the services are reasonably supported.
15 Sec. 4. 21 V.S.A. § 650 is amended to read:
16 § 650. PAYMENT; AVERAGE WAGE; COMPUTATION
17 * * *
18 (f)(1)(A) When benefits have been awarded or are not in dispute as
19 provided in subsection (e) of this section, the employer shall establish a
20 weekday on which payment shall be mailed or deposited and notify the

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 6 of 17
1 claimant and the Department of that day. The employer shall ensure that each
2 weekly payment is mailed or deposited on or before the day established.
3 (B) Payment shall be made by direct deposit to a claimant who elects
4 that payment method. The employer shall notify the claimant of the
5 claimant’s right to payment by direct deposit.
6 (2) If the benefit payment is not mailed or deposited on the day
7 established, or if the payment is not mailed or deposited within five business
8 days following the end of the pay period the payment covers, the employer
9 shall pay to the claimant a late fee equal to the greater of $10.00 or:
10 (A) five percent of the benefit amount, whichever is greater, for each
11 weekly the first payment that is made after the established day;
12 (B) 10 percent of the benefit amount for the second payment that is
13 made after the established day; and
14 (C) 15 percent of the benefit amount for the third and any subsequent
15 payments that are made after the established day.
16 (3) As used in this subsection, “paid” means the payment is mailed to
17 the claimant’s mailing address or, in the case of direct deposit, transferred into
18 the designated account. In the event of a dispute, proof of payment shall be
19 established by affidavit.
20 * * * Labor Relations * * *
21 Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 1011 is amended to read:

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 7 of 17
1 § 1011. DEFINITIONS
2 As used in this chapter:
3 * * *
4 (8) “Employee,” means any individual employed and compensated on a
5 permanent or limited status basis by the Judiciary Department, including
6 permanent part-time employees and any individual whose employment has
7 ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute or
8 because of an unfair labor practice. “Employee” does not include any of the
9 following:
10 (A) a Justice, judge, assistant judge, magistrate, or hearing officer;
11 (B) the Court Administrator;
12 (C) a managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee;
13 (D) a law clerk, attorney, or administrative assistant or private
14 secretary to a judge, Justice, or Court Administrator;
15 (E) an individual employed on a temporary, contractual, seasonal, or
16 on-call basis, including an intern;
17 (F) an employee during the initial or extended probationary period;
18 (G) the head of a department or division;
19 (H) [Repealed.]
20 (I) an attorney for the Supreme Court, for the Court Administrator,
21 or for any board or commission created by the Supreme Court;

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 8 of 17
1 (J) an employee paid by the State who is appointed part-time as
2 county clerk pursuant to 4 V.S.A. § 651 or 691;
3 (K) an employee who, after hearing by the Board upon petition of
4 any individual, the employer, or a collective bargaining unit, is determined to
5 be in a position that is sufficiently inconsistent with the spirit and intent of this
6 chapter to warrant exclusion.
7 * * *
Sec. 5a. 3 V.S.A. § 941 is amended to read:
§ 941. UNIT DETERMINATION, CERTIFICATION, AND
REPRESENTATION
* * *
(c)(1) A petition may be filed with the Board, in accordance with
procedures prescribed by the Board by an employee or group of employees, or
any individual or employee organization purporting to act on their behalf,
alleging by filing a petition or petitions bearing signatures of not less than 30
percent of the employees that they wish to form a bargaining unit and be
represented for collective bargaining, or that the individual or employee
organization currently certified as the bargaining agent is no longer supported
by at least 51 percent of the employees in the bargaining unit, or that they are
now included in an approved bargaining unit and wish to form a separate
bargaining unit under Board criteria for purposes of collective bargaining.
The employee, group of employees, individual, or employee organization that
files the petition, shall, at the same time that the petition is filed with the
Board, provide a copy of the petition to the employer and, if appropriate, the
current bargaining agent.
(2) A petition may be filed with the Board, in accordance with
procedures prescribed by the Board, by an employee or group of employees, or
any individual or employee organization purporting to act on their behalf,
alleging by filing a petition or petitions bearing signatures of not less than 50
percent plus one of the employees that the individual or employee organization
currently certified as the bargaining agent is no longer supported by a
majority of the employees in the bargaining unit. The employee, group of
employees, individual, or employee organization that files the petition shall, at
the same time that the petition is filed with the Board, provide a copy of the
petition to the employer and, if appropriate, the current bargaining agent.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 9 of 17
(A)(i) An employer shall, not more than seven business days after
receiving a copy of the petition, file any objections to the appropriateness of
the proposed bargaining unit and raise any other unit determination issues
with the Board and provide a copy of the filing to the employee, group of
employees, individual, or employee organization that filed the petition.
* * *
(d) The Board, a Board member, or a person or persons designated by the
Board shall investigate the petition and do one of the following:
(1) Determine that the petition has made a sufficient showing of interest
pursuant to subdivision subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section.
* * *
* * * State Construction Projects * * *
Sec. 5b. 29 V.S.A. § 161 is amended to read:
§ 161. REQUIREMENTS ON STATE CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS
* * *
(d) Subsections (a) through (c) and subsection (g) of this section shall not
apply to maintenance or construction projects carried out by the Agency of
Transportation and by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
* * *
(g) Employers and subcontractors contracting with the State of Vermont
pursuant to this section shall keep a true and accurate record of all employees
working on the project.
(1) For each employee, the record shall include:
(A) the name of the employee;
(B) the address of the employee;
(C) the hours worked by the employee;
(D) the wages paid to the employee;
(E) the employee’s rate of pay; and
(F) the classification of the employee; the licensed trades shall
supply proof of classification of journey workers and indentured apprentices.
(2) The records described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
submitted weekly by U.S. mail or email to the State agency overseeing the
construction project. The records shall be accompanied by a signed statement
from the employer or subcontractor verifying the accuracy of the records.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 10 of 17
(3) Each employer and subcontractor shall preserve the records
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection for three years from the date of
completion of the State project. The records shall be available for inspection
by the Commissioner of Labor at any reasonable time upon request.
(4) The records received pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection
shall be subject to inspection or copying pursuant to 1 V.S.A. §§ 315–320.
1 Sec. 6. VERMONT LABOR RELATIONS BOARD; APPROPRIATION
2 fiscal year 2026, $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
3 Labor Relations Board to increase staffing.
Sec. 76. EFFECTIVE DATE
4 This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1–5a shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
(b) Sec. 5b shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 1. [Deleted.]
Sec. 2. [Deleted.]
Sec. 3. [Deleted.]
Sec. 4. [Deleted.]
* * * Labor Relations * * *
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 1011 is amended to read:
§ 1011. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(8) “Employee,” means any individual employed and compensated on a
permanent or limited status basis by the Judiciary Department, including
permanent part-time employees and any individual whose employment has
ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute
or because of an unfair labor practice. “Employee” does not include any of
the following:
(A) a Justice, judge, assistant judge, magistrate, or hearing officer;

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 11 of 17
(B) the Court Administrator;
(C) a managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee;
(D) a law clerk, attorney, or administrative assistant or private
secretary to a judge, Justice, or Court Administrator;
(E) an individual employed on a temporary, contractual, seasonal, or
on-call basis, including an intern;
(F) an employee during the initial or extended probationary period;
(G) the head of a department or division;
(H) [Repealed.]
(I) an attorney for the Supreme Court, for the Court Administrator, or
for any board or commission created by the Supreme Court;
(J) an employee paid by the State who is appointed part-time as
county clerk pursuant to 4 V.S.A. § 651 or 691;
(K) an employee who, after hearing by the Board upon petition of
any individual, the employer, or a collective bargaining unit, is determined to
be in a position that is sufficiently inconsistent with the spirit and intent of this
chapter to warrant exclusion.
* * *
Sec. 5a. 3 V.S.A. § 941 is amended to read:
§ 941. UNIT DETERMINATION, CERTIFICATION, AND
REPRESENTATION
* * *
(c)(1) A petition may be filed with the Board, in accordance with
procedures prescribed by the Board by an employee or group of employees, or
any individual or employee organization purporting to act on their behalf,
alleging by filing a petition or petitions bearing signatures of not less than 30
percent of the employees that they wish to form a bargaining unit and be
represented for collective bargaining, or that the individual or employee
organization currently certified as the bargaining agent is no longer supported
by at least 51 percent of the employees in the bargaining unit, or that they are
now included in an approved bargaining unit and wish to form a separate
bargaining unit under Board criteria for purposes of collective bargaining.
The employee, group of employees, individual, or employee organization that
files the petition, shall, at the same time that the petition is filed with the
Board, provide a copy of the petition to the employer and, if appropriate, the
current bargaining agent.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 12 of 17
(2) A petition may be filed with the Board, in accordance with
procedures prescribed by the Board, by an employee or group of employees, or
any individual or employee organization purporting to act on their behalf,
alleging by filing a petition or petitions bearing signatures of not less than 50
percent plus one of the employees that the individual or employee organization
currently certified as the bargaining agent is no longer supported by a
majority of the employees in the bargaining unit. The employee, group of
employees, individual, or employee organization that files the petition shall, at
the same time that the petition is filed with the Board, provide a copy of the
petition to the employer and, if appropriate, the current bargaining agent.
(A)(i) An employer shall, not more than seven business days after
receiving a copy of the petition, file any objections to the appropriateness of
the proposed bargaining unit and raise any other unit determination issues
with the Board and provide a copy of the filing to the employee, group of
employees, individual, or employee organization that filed the petition.
* * *
(d) The Board, a Board member, or a person or persons designated by the
Board shall investigate the petition and do one of the following:
(1) Determine that the petition has made a sufficient showing of interest
pursuant to subdivision subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section.
* * *
Sec. 5b. [Deleted.]
Sec. 5c. 3 V.S.A. § 1021 is amended to read:
§ 1021. UNIT DETERMINATION; CERTIFICATION
(a) The Board shall determine issues of unit determination, certification,
decertification, and representation in accordance with this chapter and the
provisions of section 941 of this title. The Board shall decide the appropriate
unit for collective bargaining in each case and the employees to be included in
that unit to assure the employees the fullest freedom in exercising the rights
guaranteed by this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 5d. 16 V.S.A. § 1992 is amended to read:
§ 1992. REFERENDUM PROCEDURE FOR REPRESENTATION
* * *
(b) Certification of a negotiating unit as exclusive representative shall be
valid and not subject to challenge by referendum petition or otherwise for the

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 13 of 17
remainder of the fiscal year in which the certification occurs and for an
additional period of 12 months after final adoption of the budget for the
succeeding fiscal year and shall continue thereafter until a new referendum is
called for. An organization or group of teachers or administrators, or any
person purporting to act on their behalf, shall submit a petition bearing
signatures of not less than 50 percent plus one of the individuals currently in
the bargaining unit alleging that the current exclusive representative of the
teachers or administrators is no longer supported by a majority of the teachers
or administrators employed by that school board. A copy of the petition shall
be provided to the current bargaining agent at the same time as the petition is
submitted to the school board.
* * *
Sec. 5e. 21 V.S.A. §§ 1581 and 1584 are amended to read:
§ 1581. PETITIONS FOR ELECTION; FILING, INVESTIGATIONS,
HEARINGS, DETERMINATIONS
(a) A petition may be filed with the Board, in accordance with rules
adopted by the Board:
(1) By by an employee or group of employees, or any individual or labor
organization acting in their behalf, alleging that not less than 30 percent of the
employees:
(A) wish to be represented for collective bargaining and that their
employer declines to recognize their representative as the representative
defined in section 1583 of this title; or
(2)(B) by an employee or group of employees, or any individual or labor
organization acting on their behalf, alleging that not less than 50 percent plus
one of the employees assert that the individual or labor organization that has
been certified, or is being currently recognized by their employer as the
bargaining representative, is no longer a representative as defined in section
1583 of this title.; or
(2)(3) By by an employer, alleging that one or more individuals or labor
organizations have presented to him or her a claim to be recognized as the
representative defined in section 1583 of this title.
* * *
§ 1584. PETITIONS AND ELECTION TO RESCIND
REPRESENTATIVE’S AUTHORITY
(a) When 30 50 percent plus one or more of the employees in a bargaining
unit covered by an agreement between their employer and a labor organization

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 14 of 17
requiring membership in a labor organization as a condition of employment
file a petition alleging that they desire that the authority of the labor
organization to make such an agreement be rescinded, the Board shall take a
secret ballot of the employees in such unit and certify the results thereof, in
writing, to the labor organization and to the employer.
(b) No election shall be conducted under this section in a bargaining unit
or a subdivision within which in the preceding 12 months a valid election or
certification of a representative pursuant to this subchapter has occurred.
Sec. 5f. 21 V.S.A. § 1724 is amended to read:
§ 1724. CERTIFICATION PROCEDURE
(a)(1) A petition may be filed with the Board, in accordance with rules
adopted by the Board:
(A) By an employee or group of employees, or any individual or
employee organization purporting to act on their behalf, alleging that not less
than 30 percent of the employees wish to form a bargaining unit and be
represented for collective bargaining, or assert that the individual or employee
organization currently certified as bargaining agent is no longer supported by
at least 51 percent of the employees in the bargaining unit, or that not less
than 51 percent of the employees now included in an approved bargaining unit
wish to form a separate bargaining unit under Board criteria for purposes of
collective bargaining. The employee, group of employees, individual, or
employee organization that files the petition shall, at the same time that the
petition is filed with the Board, provide a copy of the petition to the employer
and, if appropriate, the current bargaining agent.
(B) By the employer alleging that the presently certified bargaining
unit is no longer appropriate under Board criteria. The employer shall
provide a copy of the petition to the current bargaining agent at the same time
that the petition is filed with the Board.
(C) By an employee or group of employees, or any individual or
employee organization purporting to act on their behalf, alleging that a
majority of the employees in the bargaining unit no longer support the
individual or employee organization currently certified as the bargaining
agent. The petition shall bear signatures of not less than 50 percent plus one
of the employees in the presently certified bargaining unit. The employee,
group of employees, individual, or employee organization that files the petition
shall, at the same time that the petition is filed with the Board, provide a copy
of the petition to the employer and, if appropriate, the current bargaining
agent.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 15 of 17
(2)(A)(i) An employer shall, not more than seven business days after
receiving a copy of the petition, file any objections to the appropriateness of
the proposed bargaining unit and raise any other unit determination issues
with the Board and provide a copy of the filing to the employee, group of
employees, individual, or employee organization that filed the petition.
(ii) A hearing shall be held before the Board pursuant to
subdivision (d)(1)(B) of this section in the event the employer challenges the
appropriateness of the proposed bargaining unit, provided that a hearing shall
not be held if the parties stipulate to the composition of the appropriate
bargaining unit and resolve any unit determination issues before the hearing.
(iii) The Board may endeavor to informally mediate any dispute
regarding the appropriateness of the proposed bargaining unit prior to the
hearing.
(B)(i) Within five business days after receiving a copy of the petition,
the employer shall file with the Board and the employee or group of employees,
or the individual or employee organization purporting to act on their behalf, a
list of the names and job titles of the employees in the proposed bargaining
unit. To the extent possible, the list of employees shall be in alphabetical order
by last name and provided in electronic format.
(ii) An employee or group of employees, or any person purporting
to act on their behalf, that is seeking to demonstrate that the current
bargaining agent is no longer supported by at least 51 percent a majority of
the employees in the bargaining unit shall not be entitled to obtain a list of the
employees in the bargaining unit from the employer pursuant to this
subdivision (a)(2)(B), but may obtain a list pursuant to subdivision (e)(3) of
this section after the Board has investigated its petition and determined that a
secret ballot election shall be conducted.
(iii) The list shall be kept confidential and shall be exempt from
copying and inspection under the Public Records Act.
* * *
(b) The Board, a Board member, or a person or persons designated by the
Board shall investigate the petition and do one of the following:
(1) Determine that the petition has made a sufficient showing of interest
pursuant to subdivision subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (C) of this section.
(2)(A) If it finds reasonable cause to believe that a question of unit
determination or representation exists, the Board shall schedule a hearing to
be held before the Board not more than ten 10 business days after the petition
was filed with the Board.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 16 of 17
* * *
(e)(1) Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subsection (h) of this
section, in determining the representation of municipal employees in a
collective bargaining unit, the Board shall conduct an election by secret ballot
of the employees and certify the results to the interested parties and to the
employer. The election shall be held not more than 23 business days after the
petition is filed with the Board except as otherwise provided pursuant to
subdivision (4) of this subsection.
(2) The original ballot shall permit a vote against representation by
anyone named on the ballot. No representative will be certified with less than
a 51 percent affirmative vote majority of all votes cast. If it is asserted that the
certified bargaining agent is no longer supported by at least 51 50 percent plus
one of the employees in the bargaining unit and there is no attempt to seek the
election of another employee organization or individual as bargaining
representative, there shall be at least 51 percent negative vote a majority of all
votes cast to decertify the existing bargaining agent.
* * *
Sec. 5g. 21 V.S.A. § 1635 is amended to read:
§ 1635. ELECTION; BARGAINING UNIT
(a) Petitions Certification and decertification petitions and elections shall
be conducted pursuant to the procedures provided in 3 V.S.A. §§ 941 and 942,
except that only one bargaining unit shall exist for independent direct support
providers, and the exclusive representative shall be the exclusive representative
for the purpose of grievances.
* * *
Sec. 5h. 33 V.S.A. § 3607 is amended to read:
§ 3607. PETITIONS FOR ELECTION; FILING; INVESTIGATIONS;
HEARINGS; DETERMINATIONS
(a) A petition may be filed with the Board in accordance with rules
prescribed by the Board:
(1) By an early care and education provider or group of providers or
any individual or labor organization acting on the providers’ behalf:
(A) alleging Alleging that not less than 30 percent of the providers in
the petitioned bargaining unit wish to be represented for collective bargaining
and that the State declines to recognize their representative as the
representative defined in this chapter; or.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.125
2025 Page 17 of 17
(B) asserting Asserting that the labor organization that has been
certified as the bargaining representative no longer represents a majority of
early care and education providers. The petition alleging that the labor
organization is no longer supported by a majority of the providers shall bear
signatures of not less than 50 percent plus one of the providers in the
bargaining unit.
(2) By the State alleging that one or more individuals or labor
organizations have presented a claim to be recognized as the exclusive
representative defined in this chapter.
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.